Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 3. Stock Shows and Improvement of Livestock.

§ 69-5-101.
Mississippi Livestock Show; creation; directors.

In order to encourage and promote the raising of livestock and dairy stock in the state, there is hereby created a body politic and corporate to be hereafter known as “Mississippi Livestock Show” which said body politic and corporate shall be under the management and control of the commissioner of agriculture and commerce, director of extension service, and president of Mississippi Livestock Council, hereinafter designated as directors, who shall serve without compensation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4905; Laws, 1938, ch. 183; Laws, 1940, ch. 217; Laws, 1946, ch. 251, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1948, chs. 195 (paragraph 4, supra) 218 (paragraph 2, supra); Laws, 1968, ch. 244, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 346, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 300, § 1(a), eff from and after passage (approved January 22, 1973).

§ 69-5-103.
Livestock show districts.

For the purposes of this article, the State of Mississippi is hereby divided into five (5) livestock show districts, as follows:

The Northwest District, which shall embrace the Counties of Coahoma, DeSoto, Grenada, Lafayette, Marshall, Panola, Quitman, Tallahatchie, Tate, Tunica and Yalobusha Counties. The place for holding the livestock show shall be at Batesville, in Panola County.

The North Delta District, which shall embrace the Counties of Attala, Bolivar, Carroll, Holmes, Humphreys, Issaquena, Leflore, Montgomery, Sharkey, Sunflower and Washington Counties. The place for holding the livestock show shall be at Greenwood, in Leflore County.

The Northeast District, which shall embrace the Counties of Alcorn, Benton, Calhoun, Chickasaw, Choctaw, Clay, Itawamba, Lee, Lowndes, Monroe, Noxubee, Oktibbeha, Pontotoc, Prentiss, Tippah, Tishomingo, Union, Webster and Winston. The place for holding the livestock show shall be at Verona, in Lee County.

The Southwest District, which shall embrace the Counties of Adams, Amite, Claiborne, Copiah, Franklin, Hinds, Jefferson, Lawrence, Leake, Lincoln, Madison, Neshoba, Newton, Pike, Rankin, Scott, Simpson, Smith, Walthall, Warren, Wilkinson and Yazoo. The place for holding the livestock show shall be at Jackson, in Hinds County.

The Southeast District, which shall embrace the counties of Clarke, Covington, Forrest, George, Greene, Hancock, Harrison, Jackson, Jasper, Jefferson Davis, Jones, Kemper, Lamar, Lauderdale, Marion, Pearl River, Perry, Stone and Wayne. The place for holding the livestock show shall be at Hattiesburg, in Forrest County.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4905; Laws, 1938, ch. 183; Laws, 1940, ch. 217; Laws, 1946, ch. 251, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1948, chs. 195 (paragraph 4, supra) 218 (paragraph 2, supra); Laws, 1968, ch. 244, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 346, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 300, § 1(b); Laws, 1995, ch. 370, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 69-5-105.
Holding of livestock shows.

There shall be held at the place named in each district a livestock show once each year at a time to be fixed by the directors, and under the supervision and rules and regulations promulgated by said directors at which the owners of livestock within the district where the livestock show is held may exhibit and compete for prizes or awards offered by the directors of such livestock shows or for prizes or awards offered by any person or corporation, through the directors, upon complying with the regulations governing such livestock show.

If the building for holding the livestock show in the place designated in Section 69-5-103 is damaged or destroyed by fire, storm or other disaster, then the directors are authorized to allow for holding the show at another place in the district until building in the designated place be repaired or reconstructed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4905; Laws, 1938, ch. 183; Laws, 1940, ch. 217; Laws, 1946, ch. 251, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1948, chs. 195 (paragraph 4, supra) 218 (paragraph 2, supra); Laws, 1968, ch. 244, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch 346, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 300, § 1(c, 9), eff from and after passage (approved January 22, 1973).

§ 69-5-107.
Dairy shows.

Dairy shows shall be held, in addition to the livestock shows, each fall at Verona in Lee County, at Newton in Newton County, Tylertown in Walthall County, and at Purvis in Lamar County, and each summer at the Neshoba County Fair in Neshoba County, and any person in the state is entitled to participate in any of the dairy shows. The dairy shows shall be supervised and handled in the same manner as provided for livestock shows in Section 69-5-105, and each of the five (5) dairy shows herein provided for shall receive such part of the monies appropriated for the Mississippi Livestock Show as shall be specified in the act making such appropriation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4905; Laws, 1938, ch. 183; Laws, 1940, ch. 217; Laws, 1946, ch. 251, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1948, chs. 195 (paragraph 4, supra) 218 (paragraph 2, supra); Laws, 1968, ch. 244, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 346, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 359, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 300, § 1 (d); Laws, 1979, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 370, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 476, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 349, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 2013).

§ 69-5-109.
Roundup shows.

A roundup show shall be held, in addition to the livestock and dairy shows, once each year at a time and place to be fixed by the directors mentioned in Section 69-5-101, and under the supervision and rules and regulations promulgated by said directors. At such roundup show the owners of any livestock, who have won prizes or awards within the immediately preceding twelve months in any of the livestock or dairy shows referred to in this article may exhibit such livestock and compete for prizes or awards offered by the directors of such livestock shows or for prizes or awards offered by any person or corporation, through the directors, upon complying with the regulations governing such roundup show. The roundup shall be held in the district agreeing to pay the expense thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4905; Laws, 1938, ch. 183; Laws, 1940, ch. 217; Laws, 1946, ch. 251, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1948, chs. 195 (paragraph 4, supra) 218 (paragraph 2, supra); Laws, 1968, ch. 244, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 346, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1971.

§ 69-5-111.
Prizes or awards.

The directors mentioned in Section 69-5-101 are hereby authorized to accept and hold for the use of the Mississippi Livestock Show or the dairy shows or the roundup show any appropriation, donation, or other fund donated to or to be awarded as prizes or awards under regulations promulgated by the directors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4905; Laws, 1938, ch. 183; Laws, 1940, ch. 217; Laws, 1946, ch. 251, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1948, chs. 195 (paragraph 4, supra) 218 (paragraph 2, supra); Laws, 1968, ch. 244, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 346, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1971.

§ 69-5-113.
Supervisors may appropriate money in aid of livestock shows.

The board of supervisors of any county in Mississippi is hereby authorized, in its discretion, to appropriate money out of the general fund of the county, not to exceed the sum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) annually, to aid in the payment of premiums and awards made and given by livestock shows located, held and operated in the livestock show district in which such county is embraced and included, as provided in Section 69-5-103, and to help defray the expenses of such livestock shows.

Any funds appropriated, as provided in the first paragraph hereof, may be paid over to the directors of such livestock show, or to the local committee in charge of such livestock show, as the board of supervisors may determine; and such funds shall be used in helping to pay for prizes or awards offered at such show and other expenses incurred in promoting and carrying out such livestock shows.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4907; Laws, 1940, ch. 210; Laws, 1979, ch. 335, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 69-5-114.
Certain livestock shows to be held at no charge for use of facilities

In any livestock facility constructed, renovated or expanded with funds from the grant program authorized under Section 18, Chapter 530, Laws of 1995, the members of the Future Farmers of America, the 4-H Club, the Junior Livestock Association, the Mississippi Cattlemen’s Association and the United States Pony Club, Inc., may hold up to three (3) animal or livestock shows or sales per year per facility at no charge for use of the facility or for utilities.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 321, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 354, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 423, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 314, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015; Laws, 2018, ch. 316, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 69-5-115.
Mississippi Delta Livestock Fair Association; creation; holding of livestock shows; prizes and awards.

In order to encourage and promote the raising of livestock in the State of Mississippi there is hereby created a body politic and corporate to be hereinafter known as “Mississippi Delta Livestock Fair Association,” which said body politic and corporate shall be under the management and control of the commissioner of agriculture and commerce, director of extension service, and president of the Mississippi Livestock Association, hereinafter designated as directors, who shall serve without compensation.

The Mississippi Delta Livestock Fair Association shall each year, at a time to be fixed by the directors, and under the supervision and rules and regulations promulgated by said directors, hold a livestock show at Greenwood in Leflore county, for the counties of Bolivar, Carroll, Coahoma, Holmes, Humphreys, Issaquena, Leflore, Sharkey, Sunflower, Washington, Yazoo, Tallahatchie, and Montgomery, at which the owners of livestock within said counties may exhibit and compete for prizes or awards offered by the directors of the said Mississippi Delta Livestock Fair Association, or for prizes or awards offered by any person or corporation through said directors, upon complying with the rules and regulations governing such livestock show.

No owner of livestock who has competed for a prize at any of the district livestock shows provided for in Section 69-5-105, during the current year, shall be eligible to compete for a prize at the show herein provided for in that year; and likewise, no one who competed for a prize at the show herein provided for during the current year shall be eligible to compete for a prize at any of the said district livestock shows during the current year.

The directors are hereby authorized to accept and hold for use at the Mississippi Delta Livestock Fair Association any appropriations, donations, or other funds designated to or to be awarded as prizes or awards under regulations promulgated by the directors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4906; Laws, 1942, ch. 260.

§ 69-5-117.
Mississippi Delta Livestock Fair Association; appropriations by supervisors.

The board of supervisors of any of the counties composing the Mississippi Delta Livestock Fair Association, as provided by Section 69-5-115, is authorized and empowered within its discretion to appropriate not exceeding fifteen hundred dollars per annum out of the general funds of such counties or as hereinafter provided for the purpose of maintaining and supporting the said Mississippi Delta Livestock Fair Association, and to aid in payment of premiums and awards given by livestock shows held by said association in said livestock district, and to help defray the expenses of such livestock shows; and any funds appropriated for the purpose herein provided may be appropriated by the board direct for the purpose herein mentioned, or the board may pay such funds direct to the directors of said livestock fair association, and said funds shall be used exclusively for the purpose herein mentioned; and if said funds are paid to the directors of said livestock fair association, then said funds shall be used exclusively by the directors of the livestock fair association for the purpose of maintaining and supporting the livestock fair association, and to aid in the payment of premiums and awards given by livestock shows held by said association in said district; and in the event said funds are appropriated and paid over to the directors of said association, it shall be the duty of said directors to keep a strict account of how such funds are used for that association, and they are hereby required to render to the board an itemized statement annually of all expenditures made by it under this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4906-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 252, § 1.

§ 69-5-119.
Mississippi Delta Livestock Fair Association; supervisors may levy tax.

The board of supervisors of all counties in this state, composing the Mississippi Delta Livestock Fair Association as provided in Section 69-5-115 is authorized and empowered, in its discretion to levy annually a special tax of not exceeding one-fourth of a mill on the dollar, on all of the taxable property of the county, for the purpose of deriving sufficient funds for the purpose of maintaining and supporting the Mississippi Delta Livestock Fair Association, and to aid in the payment of premiums and awards given by livestock shows conducted by said association in said district, and to help defray the expenses of such livestock shows of said district. All revenue derived from such tax levy, shall be covered in a special fund of the county to be known as, “Mississippi Delta Livestock Fair Association Fund,” and shall be used exclusively for the purpose herein mentioned. However, the levy made under the terms of this section shall not be considered in making disbursements under Sections 27-33-1 through 27-33-65, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4906-02; Laws, 1944, ch. 252, § 2.

§ 69-5-121.
Bulls for breeding; maintenance by certain counties; defrayal of expenses.

For the purpose of promoting, fostering and encouraging the upgrading and improving of livestock, any county with an assessed valuation of Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) or more, and designated as a place for the holding of a livestock show, by the provisions of Section 69-5-103, may upon the order of the board of supervisors purchase, keep, maintain or sell bulls for breeding purposes, but not more than five (5) such bulls may be owned by any such county at any one (1) time.

The board of supervisors shall employ a proper and suitable person qualified by training and experience to aid, advise and assist livestock growers in the development of pastures, upgrading of livestock, or in any way helpful to encourage and promote the raising of livestock and who shall handle, care for, look after and be responsible for the bulls so bought, and such employee shall be charged with the duty of carrying out the provisions of this section in accordance herewith, and shall be paid such salary and expense as the board of supervisors may order, all of said sums to be paid out of the general funds of the county.

Such bulls shall be placed at convenient locations over the county under suitable maintenance contracts for their care and upkeep, and shall be available at all reasonable times to farmers and stock growers upon the payment of a nominal charge for the purpose solely of assisting in defraying the expense of such care and upkeep, the amount of such fees governed solely by such maintenance costs, and to be fixed at the discretion of the board of supervisors.

The board of supervisors shall make such rules and regulations for the services of said bulls as shall be for the best interests of the farmers and stock growers.

The board of supervisors may set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund to pay the cost of employing such person and all expenses incidental to his employment and for the purchase of bulls for breeding purposes and to provide for the care and maintenance of such bulls and for defraying any and all expense necessary to carry out the intent of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4907-01; Laws, 1944, ch. 248, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 47, eff from and after October 1, 1986.